District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-801

Incorporation — Number of incorporators required; filing and recording certificate; contents.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1283, ch. 854, § 599
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(7), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-801.
1981 Ed., § 29-1001.
1973 Ed., § 29-601.